Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1 General Provisions
38-6-126. Transfer of fire investigations section within fire prevention division of department of commerce and insurance to bureau of investigation.

The fire investigations section within the fire prevention division of the department of commerce and insurance is transferred to the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

It is the intention of the general assembly that personnel, equipment, funding, duties, authority, and property transferred on May 24, 2019, be transferred no later than January 1, 2020.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation will develop and implement a transfer plan. The plan must set forth the procedures under which transferred employees must be incorporated into the bureau.

The initial transfer of any preferred service employee pursuant to the transfer from the department of commerce and insurance to the Tennessee bureau of investigation must not result in any impairment, interruption, or diminution of employee rights, salary, benefits, leave accumulation, or employment. The commissioner of human resources may determine if there has been any impairment of rights, salary, benefits, leave accumulation, or employment as a result of the initial transfer. Any preferred service employee may seek redress of any such determination through a request for declaratory order by the commissioner of human resources pursuant to § 4-5-223.

The bureau shall electronically transmit a summary stating the cause, origin, and the circumstances of each fire investigation to the state fire marshal and the local fire department in the jurisdiction where the fire occurred.

Acts 2019, ch. 487, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 487, § 11 provided that all rules and regulations governing the fire investigations section promulgated by the department of commerce and insurance in effect on May 24, 2019, shall be transferred to the Tennessee bureau of investigation, and assigned an appropriate new control number by the secretary of state, and shall remain in full force and effect until modified or repealed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The bureau may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 487, § 12. May 24, 2019.

38-6-127. Applicability of endangered child and young adult alert program to endangered person under 21 years of age.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary and for purposes of any endangered child and young adult alert program implemented by the Tennessee bureau of investigation that is distinct from the America's Missing Broadcast Emergency Response (AMBER) Alert system and that is used to notify local media about a missing child or young adult, along with any additional available information, such program shall be applied to a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age and who meets the criteria of being endangered, as established or determined by the bureau.

Acts 2020, ch. 595, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. 2020, ch. 595, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Holly Bobo Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 595, § 3. March 20, 2020.